Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 5 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 6 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 a. For the general office of attorney general for 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, 10 including the prosecuting attorneys training program, matching 11 funds for federal violence against women grant programs, 12 victim assistance grants, the office of drug control policy 13 prosecuting attorney program, and odometer fraud enforcement, 14 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 15 positions: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,919,246 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 234.00 18 As a condition of receiving the appropriation provided 19 in this lettered paragraph, the department of justice shall 20 maintain a record of the estimated time incurred representing 21 each agency or department. 22 The general office of attorney general may temporarily 23 exceed and draw more than the amount appropriated in this 24 lettered paragraph and incur a negative cash balance as long 25 as there are receivables equal to or greater than the negative 26 balances and the amount appropriated in this lettered paragraph 27 is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 28 b. For victim assistance grants: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,176,593 30 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 31 $150,000 is allocated to provide grants to care providers 32 providing services to victims of human trafficking. The 33 remaining moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 34 are allocated to provide grants to care providers providing 35 -1- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 1/ 20 H.F. _____ services to all other victims of violent crime. 1 The balance of the victim compensation fund established in 2 section 915.94 may be used to provide salary and support of not 3 more than 24.00 full-time equivalent positions and to provide 4 maintenance for the victim compensation functions of the 5 department of justice. In addition to the full-time equivalent 6 positions authorized pursuant to this unnumbered paragraph, 7 7.00 full-time equivalent positions are authorized and shall be 8 used by the department of justice to employ one accountant and 9 four program planners. The department of justice may employ 10 the additional 7.00 full-time equivalent positions authorized 11 pursuant to this unnumbered paragraph that are in excess of the 12 number of full-time equivalent positions authorized only if 13 the department of justice receives sufficient federal moneys 14 to maintain employment for the additional full-time equivalent 15 positions during the current fiscal year. The department 16 of justice shall only employ the additional 7.00 full-time 17 equivalent positions in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient 18 federal moneys are received during each of those succeeding 19 fiscal years. 20 The department of justice shall transfer at least $150,000 21 from the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 22 to the victim assistance grant program established in section 23 13.31. 24 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 25 lettered paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 26 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 c. For legal services for persons in poverty grants as 30 provided in section 13.34: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,634,601 32 d. To improve the department of justiceâs cybersecurity and 33 technology infrastructure: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 202,060 35 -2- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 2/ 20 H.F. _____ 2. a. The department of justice, in submitting budget 1 estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, pursuant 2 to section 8.23, shall include a report of funding from sources 3 other than amounts appropriated directly from the general fund 4 of the state to the department of justice or to the office of 5 consumer advocate. These funding sources must include but 6 are not limited to reimbursements from other state agencies, 7 commissions, boards, or similar entities, and reimbursements 8 from special funds or internal accounts within the department 9 of justice. The department of justice shall also report actual 10 reimbursements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 11 and actual and expected reimbursements for the fiscal year 12 beginning July 1, 2026. 13 b. The department of justice shall include the report 14 required under paragraph âaâ, as well as information regarding 15 any revisions occurring as a result of reimbursements actually 16 received or expected at a later date, in a report to the 17 general assembly. The department of justice shall submit the 18 report on or before January 15, 2027. 19 3. a. The department of justice shall fully reimburse 20 the costs and necessary related expenses incurred by the Iowa 21 law enforcement academy to continue to employ one additional 22 instructor position who shall provide training for human 23 trafficking-related issues throughout the state. 24 b. The department of justice shall obtain the moneys 25 necessary to reimburse the Iowa law enforcement academy to 26 employ such an instructor from unrestricted moneys from either 27 the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 or 28 the human trafficking victim fund established in section 915.95 29 or the human trafficking enforcement fund established in 2015 30 Iowa Acts, chapter 138, section 141. 31 4. Notwithstanding sections 553.19 and 714.16C, for the 32 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 33 any moneys not otherwise appropriated from the antitrust fund 34 created in section 553.19 and the consumer education and 35 -3- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 3/ 20 H.F. _____ litigation fund created in section 714.16C are appropriated to 1 the department of justice for salaries, support, maintenance, 2 and miscellaneous purposes necessary to perform the duties 3 described in section 13.2. 4 Sec. 2. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE. There is appropriated 5 from the commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to 6 the office of consumer advocate of the department of justice 7 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 8 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 9 to be used for the purposes designated: 10 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 11 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 12 equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,784,047 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 18.00 15 The office of consumer advocate shall include in its charges 16 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 17 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 18 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 19 services. 20 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FACILITIES. 21 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 22 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 23 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 24 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 25 designated: 26 a. For the operation of the Fort Madison correctional 27 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 28 miscellaneous purposes: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,724,722 30 b. For the operation of the Anamosa correctional facility, 31 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,255,974 34 c. For the operation of the Oakdale correctional facility, 35 -4- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 4/ 20 H.F. _____ including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 59,344,020 3 d. For the Oakdale correctional facility for 4 department-wide institutional pharmaceuticals and miscellaneous 5 purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,175,417 7 e. For the operation of the Newton correctional facility, 8 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,509,092 11 f. For the operation of the Mount Pleasant correctional 12 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 13 miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,619,297 15 g. For the operation of the Rockwell City correctional 16 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 17 miscellaneous purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,916,579 19 h. For the operation of the Clarinda correctional facility, 20 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,678,380 23 Moneys received by the department of corrections as 24 reimbursement for services provided to the Clarinda youth 25 corporation are appropriated to the department and shall be 26 used for the purpose of operating the Clarinda correctional 27 facility. 28 i. For the operation of the Mitchellville correctional 29 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 30 miscellaneous purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,350,539 32 j. For the operation of the Fort Dodge correctional 33 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 34 miscellaneous purposes: 35 -5- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 5/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,467,251 1 k. For reimbursement of counties for temporary confinement 2 of prisoners, as provided in sections 901.7, 904.908, and 3 906.17, and for offenders confined pursuant to section 904.513: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,345,319 5 l. For federal prison reimbursement, reimbursements for 6 out-of-state placements, and miscellaneous contracts: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,411 8 2. The department of corrections shall use moneys 9 appropriated in subsection 1 to continue to contract for the 10 services of a Muslim imam and a Native American spiritual 11 leader. 12 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. There 13 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 14 department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 15 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 16 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 17 designated: 18 1. For general administration, including salaries and the 19 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, support, 20 maintenance, employment of an education director to administer 21 a centralized education program for the correctional system, 22 and miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,650,695 24 a. It is the intent of the general assembly that each 25 lease negotiated by the department of corrections with a 26 private corporation for the purpose of providing private 27 industry employment of inmates in a correctional institution 28 shall prohibit the private corporation from utilizing inmate 29 labor for partisan political purposes for any person seeking 30 election to public office in this state and that a violation 31 of this requirement shall result in a termination of the lease 32 agreement. 33 b. It is the intent of the general assembly that as a 34 condition of receiving the appropriation provided in this 35 -6- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 6/ 20 H.F. _____ subsection the department of corrections shall not enter into 1 a lease or contractual agreement pursuant to section 904.809 2 with a private corporation for the use of building space for 3 the purpose of providing inmate employment without providing 4 that the terms of the lease or contract establish safeguards to 5 restrict, to the greatest extent feasible, access by inmates 6 working for the private corporation to personal identifying 7 information of citizens. 8 2. For educational programs for inmates at state penal 9 institutions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,108,109 11 a. To maximize the funding for educational programs, 12 the department shall establish guidelines and procedures to 13 prioritize the availability of educational and vocational 14 training for inmates based upon the goal of facilitating an 15 inmateâs successful release from the correctional institution. 16 b. The director of the department of corrections may 17 transfer moneys from Iowa prison industries and the canteen 18 operating funds established pursuant to section 904.310, for 19 use in educational programs for inmates. 20 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 21 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 22 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 23 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 24 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25 3. For the development and operation of the Iowa corrections 26 offender network (ICON) data system: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 28 4. For offender mental health and substance abuse 29 treatment: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 28,065 31 5. For department-wide duties, including operations, costs, 32 and miscellaneous purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,500,000 34 Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ JUDICIAL DISTRICT 35 -7- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 7/ 20 H.F. _____ DEPARTMENTS OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 3 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 4 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for salaries, 5 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 6 a. For the first judicial district department of 7 correctional services: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,395,981 9 It is the intent of the general assembly that the first 10 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 11 the drug courts operated by the district department. 12 b. For the second judicial district department of 13 correctional services: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,105,725 15 It is the intent of the general assembly that the second 16 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 17 two drug courts to be operated by the district department. 18 c. For the third judicial district department of 19 correctional services: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,915,376 21 d. For the fourth judicial district department of 22 correctional services: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,563,898 24 e. For the fifth judicial district department of 25 correctional services, including funding for electronic 26 monitoring devices for use on a statewide basis: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,194,813 28 It is the intent of the general assembly that the fifth 29 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 30 the drug court operated by the district department. 31 f. For the sixth judicial district department of 32 correctional services: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,554,811 34 It is the intent of the general assembly that the sixth 35 -8- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 8/ 20 H.F. _____ judicial district department of correctional services maintains 1 the drug court operated by the district department. 2 g. For the seventh judicial district department of 3 correctional services: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,003,457 5 It is the intent of the general assembly that the seventh 6 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 7 the drug court operated by the district department. 8 h. For the eighth judicial district department of 9 correctional services: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,259,926 11 2. Each judicial district department of correctional 12 services, within the moneys available, shall continue programs 13 and plans established within that district to provide for 14 intensive supervision, sex offender treatment, diversion of 15 low-risk offenders to the least restrictive sanction available, 16 job development, and expanded use of intermediate criminal 17 sanctions. 18 3. Each judicial district department of correctional 19 services shall provide alternatives to prison consistent with 20 chapter 901B. The alternatives to prison must ensure public 21 safety while providing maximum rehabilitation to the offender. 22 A judicial district department of correctional services may 23 also establish a day program. 24 4. The office of drug control policy of the department 25 of public safety shall consider federal grants made to the 26 department of corrections for the benefit of each of the eight 27 judicial district departments of correctional services as local 28 government grants, as defined pursuant to federal regulations. 29 5. The department of corrections shall continue to contract 30 with a judicial district department of correctional services 31 to provide for the rental of electronic monitoring equipment 32 available statewide. 33 6. The public safety assessment shall not be utilized in 34 pretrial hearings when determining whether to detain or release 35 -9- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 9/ 20 H.F. _____ a defendant before trial until such time the use of the public 1 safety assessment has been specifically authorized by the 2 general assembly. 3 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ REALLOCATION OF 4 APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding section 8.39, within the 5 moneys appropriated in this division of this Act to the 6 department of corrections, the department may reallocate the 7 moneys appropriated and allocated as necessary to best fulfill 8 the needs of the correctional institutions, administration 9 of the department, and the judicial district departments of 10 correctional services. However, in addition to complying with 11 the requirements of section 904.116 and providing notice to 12 the legislative services agency, the department of corrections 13 shall also provide notice to the department of management, 14 prior to the effective date of the revision or reallocation of 15 an appropriation made pursuant to this section. The department 16 of corrections shall not reallocate an appropriation or 17 allocation for the purpose of eliminating any program. 18 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ INTENT. The department 19 of corrections, in cooperation with townships, the Iowa 20 cemetery associations, and other nonprofit or governmental 21 entities, may use inmate labor during the fiscal year beginning 22 July 1, 2026, to restore or preserve rural cemeteries and 23 historical landmarks. The department, in cooperation with the 24 counties, may also use inmate labor to clean up roads, major 25 water sources, and other water sources around the state. 26 Sec. 8. STATE AGENCY PURCHASES FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES. 27 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 28 requires, âstate agencyâ means the government of the state 29 of Iowa, including but not limited to all executive branch 30 departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and commissions, the 31 judicial branch, the general assembly and all legislative 32 agencies, institutions within the purview of the state board of 33 regents, and any corporation whose primary function is to act 34 as an instrumentality of the state. 35 -10- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 10/ 20 H.F. _____ 2. State agencies are encouraged to purchase products from 1 Iowa state industries, as defined in section 904.802, when 2 purchases are required and the products are available from 3 Iowa state industries. State agencies shall obtain bids from 4 Iowa state industries for purchases of office furniture during 5 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, exceeding $5,000 or 6 in accordance with applicable administrative rules related to 7 purchases for the agency. 8 Sec. 9. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY. 9 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 10 state to the Iowa law enforcement academy for the fiscal year 11 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 12 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 13 purposes designated: 14 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 15 purposes, including jailer training and technical assistance, 16 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 17 positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919,407 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 31.00 20 b. The Iowa law enforcement academy may temporarily exceed 21 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection 22 and incur a negative cash balance as long as there are 23 receivables equal to or greater than the negative balance and 24 the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded at 25 the close of the fiscal year. 26 2. The Iowa law enforcement academy may select at least 27 five automobiles of the department of public safety, division 28 of state patrol, prior to turning over the automobiles to 29 the department of administrative services to be disposed 30 of by public auction, and the Iowa law enforcement academy 31 may exchange any automobile owned by the academy for each 32 automobile selected if the selected automobile is used in 33 training law enforcement officers at the academy. However, any 34 automobile exchanged by the academy must be substituted for 35 -11- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 11/ 20 H.F. _____ the selected vehicle of the department of public safety and 1 sold by public auction with the receipts being deposited in the 2 depreciation fund maintained pursuant to section 8A.365 to the 3 credit of the department of public safety, division of state 4 patrol. 5 3. The Iowa law enforcement academy shall provide training 6 for domestic abuse and human trafficking-related issues 7 throughout the state. The academy shall offer the training at 8 no cost to the attendees and the training shall not replace any 9 existing domestic abuse or human trafficking training offered 10 by the academy. 11 Sec. 10. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. 12 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 13 to the office of the state public defender of the department 14 of inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 16 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 17 purposes designated: 18 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 19 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 20 equivalent positions: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 38,627,894 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 276.00 23 b. For payments on behalf of eligible adults and juveniles 24 from the indigent defense fund, in accordance with section 25 815.11: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,351,374 27 2. Moneys received by the office of the state public 28 defender pursuant to Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security 29 Act remaining unencumbered and unobligated at the end of the 30 fiscal year shall not revert but shall be transferred to the 31 Tit. IV-E juvenile justice improvement fund created in 2022 32 Iowa Acts, chapter 1146, section 11, subsection 3, to remain 33 available for expenditure by the office of the state public 34 defender in succeeding fiscal years for the purposes allowed by 35 -12- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 12/ 20 H.F. _____ Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security Act. 1 Sec. 11. BOARD OF PAROLE. There is appropriated from the 2 general fund of the state to the board of parole for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,545,114 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.60 11 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE. 12 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 13 state to the department of public defense, for the fiscal year 14 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 15 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 16 purposes designated: 17 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 19 equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,646,037 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 242.00 22 2. The department of public defense may temporarily exceed 23 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this section and 24 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 25 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 26 and the amount appropriated in this section is not exceeded at 27 the close of the fiscal year. 28 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 29 MANAGEMENT. 30 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 31 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 32 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 33 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 34 to be used for the purposes designated: 35 -13- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 13/ 20 H.F. _____ For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 2 equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,396,138 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.44 5 2. The department of homeland security and emergency 6 management may temporarily exceed and draw more than the amount 7 appropriated in this section and incur a negative cash balance 8 as long as there are receivables of federal funds equal to or 9 greater than the negative balance and the amount appropriated 10 in this section is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal 11 year. 12 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. There is appropriated 13 from the general fund of the state to the department of public 14 safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 15 June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 16 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 17 1. For administrative functions, including salaries and the 18 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, the criminal 19 justice information system, and for not more than the following 20 full-time equivalent positions: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,095,906 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 33.00 23 2. For the division of criminal investigation, including 24 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 25 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 26 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 27 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 28 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 29 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 30 positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,282,804 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 184.00 33 3. For the criminalistics laboratory fund created in 34 section 691.9: 35 -14- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 14/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 1 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 2 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 3 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 4 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 5 the succeeding fiscal year. 6 4. a. For the division of narcotics enforcement, including 7 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 8 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 9 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 10 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 11 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 12 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 13 positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,496,573 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.00 16 The division of narcotics enforcement is authorized an 17 additional 1.00 full-time equivalent position pursuant to 18 this lettered paragraph that is in excess of the number of 19 full-time equivalent positions authorized for the previous 20 fiscal year only if the division of narcotics enforcement 21 receives sufficient federal moneys to maintain employment 22 for the additional full-time equivalent position during the 23 current fiscal year. The division of narcotics enforcement 24 shall only employ the additional full-time equivalent position 25 in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient federal moneys are 26 received during each of those succeeding fiscal years. 27 b. For the division of narcotics enforcement for undercover 28 purchases: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,042 30 5. For the division of state fire marshal, for fire 31 protection services as provided through the state fire service 32 and emergency response council as created in the department, 33 and for the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ 34 retirement, accident, and disability system provided in chapter 35 -15- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 15/ 20 H.F. _____ 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, 1 as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for 2 which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than the 3 following full-time equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,635,378 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 21.00 6 6. For the division of state patrol, for salaries, support, 7 maintenance, workersâ compensation costs, and miscellaneous 8 purposes, including the stateâs contribution to the peace 9 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system provided 10 in chapter 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution 11 rate, as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries 12 for which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than 13 the following full-time equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 94,251,941 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 613.00 16 It is the intent of the general assembly that members of the 17 state patrol be assigned to patrol the highways and roads in 18 lieu of assignments for inspecting school buses for the school 19 districts. 20 7. For deposit in the sick leave benefits fund established 21 in section 80.42 for all departmental employees eligible to 22 receive benefits for accrued sick leave under the collective 23 bargaining agreement: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 279,517 25 8. For costs associated with the training and equipment 26 needs of volunteer fire fighters: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,075,520 28 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 29 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 30 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 31 for expenditure for the purposes designated in this subsection 32 until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 33 9. For the public safety interoperable and broadband 34 communications fund established in section 80.44: 35 -16- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 16/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,661 1 10. For the office to combat human trafficking established 2 in section 80.45, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 3 miscellaneous purposes: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,742 5 11. For department-wide duties, including operations, 6 costs, and miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,430,000 8 12. For the office of drug control policy, for salaries, 9 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, including 10 statewide coordination of the drug abuse resistance education 11 (D.A.R.E.) programs or other similar programs, and for not more 12 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,219 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.00 15 Notwithstanding section 8.39, the department of public 16 safety may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 17 as necessary to best fulfill the needs provided for in the 18 appropriation. However, the department shall not reallocate 19 moneys appropriated to the department in this section unless 20 notice of the reallocation is given to the legislative services 21 agency and the department of management prior to the effective 22 date of the reallocation. The notice must include information 23 regarding the rationale for reallocating the moneys. The 24 department shall not reallocate moneys appropriated in this 25 section for the purpose of eliminating any program. 26 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY ââ GAMING ENFORCEMENT. 27 1. There is appropriated from the gaming enforcement 28 revolving fund created in section 80.43 to the department of 29 public safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 30 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 31 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 32 For any direct support costs for agents and officers of 33 the division of criminal investigationâs excursion gambling 34 boat, gambling structure, and racetrack enclosure enforcement 35 -17- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 17/ 20 H.F. _____ activities, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 1 miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 2 full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 13,084,081 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 68.00 5 2. For each additional license to conduct gambling games on 6 an excursion gambling boat, gambling structure, or racetrack 7 enclosure issued during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 8 there is appropriated from the gaming enforcement revolving 9 fund to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 10 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, an additional 11 amount of not more than $300,000 to be used for full-time 12 equivalent positions. 13 3. The department of public safety, with the approval of the 14 department of management, may employ no more than three special 15 agents for each additional riverboat or gambling structure 16 regulated after July 1, 2026, and three special agents for 17 each racing facility which becomes operational during the 18 fiscal year which begins July 1, 2026. Positions authorized 19 in this subsection are in addition to the full-time equivalent 20 positions otherwise authorized in this section. 21 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 22 MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 23 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 24 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 25 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 26 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 27 used for the purposes designated: 28 For implementation, support, and maintenance of the 29 functions of the administrator and program manager under 30 chapter 34A and to employ the auditor of the state to perform 31 an annual audit of the 911 emergency communications fund: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 33 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE ââ CONSUMER EDUCATION AND 34 LITIGATION ââ FARM MEDIATION AND PROSECUTIONS, APPEALS, AND 35 -18- LSB 5005YC (9) 91 as/ns 18/ 20 H.F. _____ CLAIMS. Notwithstanding section 714.16C, there is appropriated 1 from the consumer education and litigation fund to the 2 department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 3 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so 4 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 1. For farm mediation services as specified in section 7 13.13, subsection 2: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 9 2. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes for criminal prosecutions, criminal appeals, and 11 performing duties pursuant to chapter 669: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 13 DIVISION II 14 INDIGENT DEFENSE AND REPRESENTATION 15 Sec. 18. Section 815.7, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 10. For appointments made on or after July 1, 2025, through 18 June 30, 2026, the reasonable compensation shall be calculated 19 on the basis of eighty-eight dollars per hour for class âAâ 20 felonies, eighty-three dollars per hour for class âBâ felonies, 21 and seventy-eight dollars per hour for all other cases. 22 Sec. 19. Section 815.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 23 following new subsection: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. For appointments made on or after 25 July 1, 2026, the reasonable compensation shall be calculated 26 on the basis of ninety-three dollars per hour for class âAâ 27 felonies, eighty-eight dollars per hour for class âBâ felonies, 28 and eighty-three dollars per hour for all other cases. 29